Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-173.01
Director of Correctional Services; release of certain convicts; duties.

Two weeks prior to releasing a person convicted of a Class IA felony or sexual assault in the first degree on furlough, the Director of Correctional Services shall deliver a copy of the release authorization to at least one law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which such person is authorized to temporarily reside.

Laws 1986, LB 481, § 3.